Utah statutes.
65A-3-4.   Liability for causing wildland fires.

(1)  A person who negligently, recklessly, or intentionally causes or spreads a wildland fire shall be liable for the cost of suppressing that wildland fire, regardless of whether the fire begins on:

(a)  private land;

(b)  land owned by the state;

(c)  federal land; or

(d)  tribal land.

(2)  The conduct described in Subsection (1) includes any negligent, reckless, or intentional conduct, and is not limited to conduct described in Section 65A-3-2.

(3)  A person who incurs costs to suppress a wildland fire may bring an action under this section to recover those costs.

(4)  A person who suffers damage from a wildland fire may pursue all other legal remedies in addition to seeking damages under Subsection (3).

